Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 3
PAPER BALLOTS

1-7-301. Judges open ballot box first.

Immediately before proclamation is made of the opening of the polls, the election judges shall open the ballot box in the presence of those assembled and shall turn it upside down so as to empty it of anything that may be in it and then shall lock it securely. No ballot box shall be reopened until the time for counting the ballots therein.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 739, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-301 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-7-302. Electors given only one ballot.

Election judges shall give to each eligible elector a single ballot after issuing vote credit to the elector in the statewide voter registration system created in section 1-2-301.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 739, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1420, § 73, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 563, § 15, effective May 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-302 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-7-303. Spoiled ballots.

No person, except an election judge as authorized by the designated election official, shall remove any ballot from the polling place or voter service and polling center before the close of the polls. Any eligible elector who spoils a ballot may obtain others, one at a time, not exceeding three in all, upon returning each spoiled ballot. The spoiled ballots thus returned shall be immediately canceled and shall be preserved and returned to the designated election official as provided in section 1-7-701. Nothing in this section prohibits an elector from obtaining a replacement ballot pursuant to section 1-7.5-107.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 740, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 720, § 67, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-303 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7-304. Manner of voting in person.

Each eligible elector, upon receiving a ballot, shall immediately proceed unaccompanied to one of the voting booths provided. To cast a vote, the eligible elector shall clearly fill the oval, connect the arrow, or otherwise appropriately mark the name of the candidate or the names of the joint candidates of the elector's choice for each office to be filled. In the case of a ballot issue, the elector shall clearly fill the oval, connect the arrow, or otherwise appropriately mark the appropriate place opposite the answer that the elector desires to give.

Each eligible elector who has completed the ballot and is ready to vote shall then leave the voting booth and approach the election judges having charge of the ballot box. The elector shall, in full view of the election judges, deposit it in the ballot box.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 740, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 685, § 28, effective May 17.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 720, § 68, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-304 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

(1) For ballots for general and congressional vacancy elections, see § 1-5-403; for method of counting paper ballots, see § 1-7-307; for ballots improperly marked, see § 1-7-309.

(2) In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7-305. Counting by counting judges.

In precincts having counting judges, the receiving judges, at 8 a.m., or as soon thereafter as the counting judges request the ballot box, shall deliver to the counting judges the ballot box containing all ballots that have been cast up to that time, and the receiving judges shall then proceed to use the other ballot box furnished for voting. The receiving judges shall open, empty, and lock the alternate ballot box in the manner prescribed in section 1-7-301.

When the counting judges have counted the votes in a ballot box, they shall return the empty ballot box to the receiving judges and exchange it for the box containing ballots cast since taking possession of the first ballot box. The judges shall continue to exchange ballot boxes in the same manner during the day until the polls are closed and shall continue counting until all ballots have been counted.

When an exchange of ballot boxes is made as described in subsection (2) of this section, the receiving judges shall sign and furnish to the counting judges a statement showing the number of ballots that are to be found in each ballot box as indicated by the pollbooks. The counting judges shall then count ballots in the manner prescribed in section 1-7-307.

The governing body may provide a separate room or building for the counting judges but, when ballot boxes are moved from one room or building to another, they shall be under the constant observation of at least one of the counting judges.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 741, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-305 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For the election judges opening, emptying, and then locking ballot boxes, see §§ 1-7-301 and 1-7-501.

1-7-306. Counting by receiving judges. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 741, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1420, § 74, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7-307. Method of counting paper ballots.

The election judges shall first count the number of ballots in the box. If the ballots are found to exceed the number of names entered on each of the pollbooks, the election judges shall then examine the official endorsements. If, in the unanimous opinion of the judges, any of the ballots in excess of the number on the pollbooks are deemed not to bear the proper official endorsement, they shall be put into a separate pile and into a separate record, and a return of the votes in those ballots shall be made under the heading "excess ballots". When the ballots and the pollbooks agree, the judges shall proceed to count the votes.

Each ballot shall be read and counted separately. Every name and all names of joint candidates separately marked as voted for on the ballot shall be read and an entry made on each of two accounting forms before any other ballot is counted. The entire number of ballots, excepting "excess ballots", shall be read, counted, and placed on the accounting forms in like manner. When all of the ballots, except "excess ballots", have been counted, the election judges shall post the votes from the accounting forms.

When all the votes have been read and counted, the ballots shall be returned to the ballot box, the opening shall be carefully sealed, and the election judges shall place their initials on the seal. The cover shall then be locked and the ballot box delivered to the designated election official, as provided in section 1-7-701.

All persons, except election judges and watchers, shall be excluded from the place where the ballot counting is being held until the count has been completed.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 741, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1421, § 75, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-307 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For the form of ballots, see §§ 1-5-407, 1-5-408, 1-7-304 (1), and 1-7-503 (1); for improperly marked ballots, see § 1-7-309; for penalty for divulging information concerning the count prior to 7:00 p.m., see § 1-13-718.

1-7-308. Judges to keep accounting forms. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 742, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7-309. Determination of improperly marked ballots.

Votes cast for an office to be filled or a ballot issue to be decided shall not be counted if an elector marks more names than there are persons to be elected to an office or if for any reason it is impossible to determine the elector's choice of candidate or vote concerning the ballot issue; except that an elector's rankings of multiple candidates in an election using instant runoff voting shall be recorded and counted in accordance with section 1-7-1003 and rules promulgated by the secretary of state.

A defective or an incomplete cross mark on any ballot in a proper place shall be counted if no other cross mark appears on the ballot indicating an intention to vote for some other candidate or ballot issue.

No ballot shall be counted unless it has the official endorsement required by section 1-7-302.

Ballots not counted because of the election judges' inability to determine the elector's intent for all candidates and ballot issues shall be marked "defective" on the back, banded together and separated from the other ballots, returned to the ballot box, and preserved by the designated election official pursuant to section 1-7-801.

When the election judges in any precinct discover in the counting of votes that the name of any write-in candidate voted for is misspelled or omitted in part, the vote for that candidate shall be counted if the writing meets the requirements of section 1-7-114 (1).

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 742, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(5) amended, p. 1421, § 76, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (HB 21-1071), ch. 367, p. 2420, § 11, effective July 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-309 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For the form of ballots, see §§ 1-5-407, 1-5-408, 1-7-304 (1), and 1-7-503 (1); for the method of counting paper ballots, see § 1-7-307.